Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
57-4-103. Applicability of chapter — Referendum — Form of question.

This chapter shall be effective in any jurisdiction which authorizes the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106; provided, that, in addition to any other method authorized for holding an election pursuant to § 57-3-106, an election may be held for such sales upon adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of a county or municipality.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2)(B), if the county election commission receives the necessary resolution or the petition requesting the referendum not less than forty five (45) days before the date on which an election is scheduled to be held, except for referenda scheduled to be held with the regular November general election which shall be held pursuant to § 2-3-204, the county election commission shall include the referendum question contained in subsection (b) on the ballot.

In counties having a population of not less than eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000) nor more than eight hundred thirty thousand (830,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, if the county election commission receives the necessary petition requesting the referendum not less than thirty (30) days before the date on which an election is scheduled to be held, the county election commission shall include the referendum question contained in subsection (b) on the ballot.

If any county has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for sale for consumption off premises pursuant to § 57-3-106, then any municipality wholly or partially within the boundaries of the county may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises within the corporate boundaries of the municipality.

If a municipality which has created a tourism development zone as defined in § 7-88-103 has not authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum, then such municipality is authorized to conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises within the corporate boundaries of such municipality in accordance with this subdivision (a)(4). Notwithstanding § 57-3-106(c) and (f)(2), the county election commission shall place the question on the ballot of the November 2012, general election; provided, that all costs associated with the referendum election shall be paid for by the municipality to which this subdivision (a)(4) applies.

The question submitted to the voters shall be in the following form for this election:

For legal sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in (here insert name of political subdivision).

Against legal sale alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in (here insert name of political subdivision).

When a municipality is located partly within a county that has a metropolitan form of government and the county has approved sales of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises and partly within another county that has not approved sales of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, a referendum in the municipality shall be held only in that portion of the municipality located in the county that has not approved sales of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises. The referendum result shall not affect the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in the portion of the municipality located in the county having a metropolitan form of government.

If any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than sixty-six thousand two hundred (66,200) nor more than sixty-six thousand three hundred (66,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106, then any municipality having a population of not less than eight hundred fifty-five (855) nor more than eight hundred sixty-five (865) located within the boundaries of such county may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises within the corporate boundaries of such municipality, notwithstanding the population requirements of § 57-3-101(a)(13) or § 57-3-106(b)(1). The referendum shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106.

If any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand four hundred (29,400) nor more than twenty-nine thousand five hundred (29,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106, then any municipality having a population of not less than five hundred thirty (530) nor more than five hundred thirty-nine (539), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, located within the boundaries of such county, may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises within the corporate boundaries of such municipality, notwithstanding the population requirements of § 57-3-101(a)(14) or § 57-3-106(b)(1). The referendum shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106.

If any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than forty-one thousand eight hundred (41,800) nor more than forty-one thousand nine hundred (41,900), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106, then any municipality having a population of not less than four hundred sixty (460) nor more than four hundred seventy (470), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, located within the boundaries of such county, may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises within the corporate boundaries of such municipality, notwithstanding the population requirements of § 57-3-101(a)(14) or § 57-3-106(b)(1). The referendum must be conducted in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106.

If any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than sixty-six thousand two hundred (66,200) nor more than sixty-six thousand three hundred (66,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106, then any municipality having a population of not less than three hundred ten (310) nor more than three hundred nineteen (319), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, located within the boundaries of such county, may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises within the corporate boundaries of such municipality, notwithstanding the population requirements of § 57-3-101(a)(14) or § 57-3-106(b)(1). The referendum must be conducted in the manner prescribed by § 57-3-106.

At any such election, the only question submitted to the voters shall be in the following form:

For legal sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in (here insert name of political subdivision).

Against legal sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in (here insert name of political subdivision).

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 4; 1971, ch. 59, § 1; 1972, ch. 510, § 1; 1975, ch. 71, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 445, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 57-164; Acts 1984, ch. 877, § 1; 1987, ch. 456, § 2; 1988, ch. 551, § 1; 1992, ch. 711, § 1; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 18, 21; 1998, ch. 618, § 2; 2005, ch. 262, § 1; 2006, ch. 607, § 1; 2007, ch. 52, § 1; 2008, ch. 778, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 447, §§ 9, 10; 2012, ch. 1035, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 201, § 2; 2018, ch. 692, § 2; 2018, ch. 891, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2006, ch. 607, § 1 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of §57-3-106(c) requiring elections to be held at the next regular election of the municipality, the county election commission shall place the question on the ballot of the November 2006 general election; provided, that the municipal governing body of the municipality to which subdivision (a)(4) applies calls for the referendum by July 15, 2006; and provided further, that all costs associated with that referendum election shall be paid for by the calling municipality.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 692 added (a)(8).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 891 added (a)(9).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 692 § 3. April 9, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 891, § 3. May 3, 2018.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6A Tenn. Juris., Constitutional Law, § 58.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Bemis Pentecostal Church v. State: The Validity of Tennessee's Campaign Disclosure Act, 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 324 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. The 2005 amendment requires that the municipality's governing body act no later than the thirtieth day after the act takes effect. OAG 05-143 (9/20/05).

Consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises in unincorporated areas of a county, OAG 09-011 (2/3/09).

57-4-104. Applicability of amendments to chapter.

The amendments to §§57-4-101,57-4-102,57-4-201,57-4-203 and57-4-301, made by Chapter 444 of the Public Acts of 1987, shall not apply in counties having a population of:

not less than nor more than

11,700 11,800

24,590 24,600

34,800 34,900

67,300 67,400

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1987, ch. 444, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Brown bagging of liquor, OAG 89-113 (9/5/89).

57-4-105. Serving wine at art galleries.

Any art gallery that does not sell food or beverages and that receives ninety percent (90%) of its revenue from the sale of artwork may serve wine to patrons of such art gallery without a charge. Such art gallery shall not serve wine to a patron who is intoxicated or believed to be intoxicated. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any art gallery permitted to serve wine under this section shall not be required to pay any fees or taxes related to the privilege of serving wine.

Acts 2004, ch. 954, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Participation of the municipality as a whole is required in a referendum to approve liquor by the drink, OAG 06-113 (7/19/06).

57-4-106. Authority to serve or sell high alcohol content beer if authorized to serve or sell wine.

If a premises is authorized pursuant to this chapter to serve or sell wine only, the premises shall also be authorized to serve or sell high alcohol content beer, as defined in §57-3-101.

Acts 2006, ch. 733, § 7; 2014, ch. 861, § 8; 2019, ch. 435, § 3.

Effective Dates. The 2019 amendment substituted “serve or sell” for “sell” twice.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 435, § 6. May 22, 2019.

57-4-107. Sales of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in unincorporated areas of a county.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, sales of alcoholic beverages shall be permitted in unincorporated areas of a county that, by local option election in a county-wide referendum, approves the legal sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, if that county has a charter form of government. This section shall apply to any such county that has already approved this referendum prior to June 5, 2009.

In addition to the sales of alcoholic beverages authorized pursuant to subsection (a), notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, sales of alcoholic beverages shall be permitted in unincorporated areas of a county that approves the legal sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises by local option election called and held, in accordance with § 57-3-106(g), in portions of the county lying outside municipalities meeting the requirements of § 57-3-106(g)(1).

If a county-wide referendum for the legal sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises is approved in a county, the sales of alcoholic beverages are permitted in any municipality that participated in the referendum regardless of the minimum population requirement for a municipality in § 57-3-101.

Acts 2009, ch. 351, § 1; 2011, ch. 411, § 1; 2011, ch. 447, § 1; 2017, ch. 147, § 20.

57-4-108. Production, storage and sale of infused alcohol products.

As used in this title, “infusion” or “infused product” means any product created from the combining or mixing of an alcoholic beverage with nonalcoholic products or material over a sustained period of time, and at the time of the combination or mixing, the combination or mixture is not intended for immediate consumption.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an establishment licensed to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption pursuant to this part may produce, store and sell infusions pursuant to this section.

The commission may promulgate rules and regulations regarding the production, storage, and sale of infusions by any licensee in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

All alcoholic beverages used in the production of an infusion must be purchased from a licensed wholesaler.

A batch of infused product shall not:

Contain any added stimulant, drug, or illegal substance; provided, that “added stimulant”:

Means any stimulant used in the production of the infusion that is not naturally contained in any food product or beverage used in the production of the infusion; and

Includes, but is not limited to, caffeine, guarana, ginseng, and taurine and any product or beverage which includes stimulants that are not naturally included in the product or beverage, including, but not limited to, energy drinks;

Be removed or transported from the licensed premises; or

Be infused in, stored in, or dispensed from an original package of liquor or wine, or a container bearing an alcoholic beverage name brand.

A batch of infused product shall be labeled with a list of each ingredient contained in the infusion.

Acts 2014, ch. 1001, § 9; 2017, ch. 338, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §57-4-108, concerning licenses that may continue to be issued for certain retail sales of alcoholic beverages for off-premises consumption, was transferred to §57-3-219 in 2011 by the code commission.

57-4-109. Tasting of alcohol by qualified student — Criteria — Definitions.

A qualified student may taste alcoholic beverages, and the student, the authorized instructor, and the qualified academic institution in which the student is enrolled shall not be subject to criminal prosecution under § 57-5-301, § 57-4-203, § 39-15-404 or title 39, chapter 17, part 7, if all of the following criteria are met:

The qualified student tastes the alcoholic beverage while enrolled in a qualified academic institution;

The qualified academic institution has established a bachelor's degree program that is designed to train industry professionals in the production of fermented or distilled food or beverage products;

The qualified student tastes the alcoholic beverage for educational purposes as part of the instruction in a course required for the bachelor's degree; and

The alcoholic beverage remains in the control of an authorized instructor of the qualified academic institution who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a student under twenty-one (21) years of age to receive any alcoholic beverage unless it is delivered as part of the student's curriculum requirements.

A license or permit is not required to be held by a qualified academic institution engaging in the activities authorized by this section; provided, that an extra fee or charge is not imposed for the alcoholic beverages being tasted. Any tuition normally charged for a course shall not be considered an extra fee or charge.

As used in this section:

“Alcoholic beverage” includes beer as defined in § 57-5-101;

“Qualified academic institution” means a public or private university accredited by a commission recognized by the United States department of education;

“Qualified student” means a student enrolled in a fermentation science degree program at a qualified academic institution who has completed a minimum of sixty (60) hours of coursework; and

“Taste” means to draw an alcoholic beverage into the mouth, but does not include swallowing or otherwise consuming the alcoholic beverage.

Acts 2016, ch. 709, § 1.

57-4-110. Interest of licensed manufacturer in licensed establishment.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a manufacturer licensed under § 57-3-202 may have a direct or indirect interest in any establishment licensed pursuant to this part; provided, that such interest is held in an irrevocable trust by an independent trustee.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Acts 2017, ch. 371, § 3; 2019, ch. 94, § 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted (b), which read: “This section is deleted on July 1, 2019, and shall no longer be effective on and after such date.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 94, § 3. March 28, 2019.